Connecticut, session 2026, SB00060.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 219 of the general statutes be amended to (1) decrease
the sales and use taxes rate to six per cent, and (2) eliminate the
additional one per cent sales and use taxes imposed on meals sold by
eating establishments, caterers or grocery stores.